Illinois, session 104th, SB1010.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 20/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1051)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.9(Source: P.A. 85-1012.)